Hawaii statutes.
§37-73 Legislative review. The
legislature shall consider the governor's proposed program and financial plan
and budget; evaluate alternatives to the governor's recommendations; and adopt
programs and determine the state budget. It may, from time to time, request
the department of budget and finance and any agency to conduct such analysis of
programs and finances as will assist in determining the State's program and
financial plan and budget. [L 1970, c 185, §12; ren L 1972, c 72, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next